New Jersey, session 221, A3052.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provision of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall operate a vehicle agency and a licensing agency in each county in the State, or shall operate an agency in each county in the State that provides both vehicle and licensing services. For purposes of this section: Licensing agency shall mean a commission office that provides licensing and identification services, including, but not limited to, the issuance of basic drivers licenses, examination permits, special learners permits, probationary drivers licenses, and identification cards; Vehicle agency shall mean a commission office that provides motor vehicle registration services, including, but not limited to, the registration of motor vehicles and the issuance of registration certificates, motor vehicle certificates of ownership, and motor vehicle license plates; and Vehicle and licensing services shall include, but not be limited to, the issuance of basic drivers licenses, examination permits, special learners permits, probationary drivers licenses, identification cards, registration certificates, motor vehicle certificates of ownership, and motor vehicle license plates. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month after enactment.